Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF484.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2418XS (2) 91 lh/ko S.F. 484 Section 1. Section 514I.5, subsection 4, paragraph c, Code 1 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (18) Applied behavior analysis services. 3 Sec. 2. CHILDRENâS HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM ââ APPLIED 4 BEHAVIOR ANALYSIS SERVICES. The department of health and human 5 services shall submit a state plan amendment to the centers for 6 Medicare and Medicaid services of the United States department 7 of health and human services for approval to provide coverage 8 for applied behavior analysis services under the childrenâs 9 health insurance program. 10